Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5524.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 10q. (1) The department shall create and operate a road construction business loss reimbursement program. The department shall provide grants under the program to businesses for revenue lost due to an unexpected street closure or a construction project that extends significantly beyond its scheduled end date. The amount of a grant must be equal to the recipient's decline in revenue up to a maximum amount of $15,000.00 per year. (2) An application for a grant must be made on a form approved by the department and must contain the information required by the department. An application for a grant may be made at any time as determined by the department. (3) To qualify for a grant, a business must demonstrate a significant decline in revenue caused by a road construction project. The decline in revenue must be determined by using an average of profits during the immediately preceding 3 tax years. (4) The department shall establish a review process for considering applications for grants. No later than 120 days after receiving an application for a grant, the department shall notify the applicant in writing whether the application is approved or rejected. The department shall prioritize the awarding of each grant on a case-by-case basis using all of the following criteria: (a) Rate of decline in revenue. (b) Duration of construction. (c) Proximity to construction. (d) Severity of traffic disruption during construction. (e) Lack of access for pedestrian traffic during construction. (f) Any other criteria the department determines to be relevant. (5) For each year in which the department receives an application for a grant, the department shall report by December 1 to the standing committees of the senate and house of representatives with primary jurisdiction over transportation issues and the senate and house of representatives appropriations committees on the utilization of money from the program. The report must include, at a minimum, all of the following information for the immediately preceding fiscal year: (a) The number of applications received. (b) The name of each business applying for a grant, and whether each application was approved or denied. (c) For each application approved, a status report on the construction project that caused the lost revenue claimed by the grant recipient. (6) The road construction business loss reimbursement fund is created in the state treasury. (7) The state treasurer shall deposit money and other assets received from any source in the fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of money in the fund and credit interest and earnings from the investments to the fund. (8) The department is the administrator of the fund for audits of the fund. (9) The department shall expend money from the fund on appropriation only to fund and operate the program. (10) As used in this section: (a) "Fund" means the road construction business loss reimbursement fund created in subsection (6). (b) "Grant" means a grant under the program. (c) "Program" means the road construction business loss reimbursement program created in subsection (1).